Massachusetts, session 194th, S1514.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 24N of Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out paragraph (c) in its entirety and inserting in
place thereof the following paragraph:-
(c) There shall be a vaccine program advisory council consisting of the commissioner of
public health or a designee, who shall serve as chair; the medical director of the universal
immunization program of the department of public health established under section 24I; the
executive director for the center for health information and analysis or a designee; the executive
director of the commonwealth health insurance connector authority or a designee; 1 person to be
appointed by the director of Medicaid, who shall be a representative of managed care
organizations contracting with MassHealth; 3 persons to be appointed by the commissioner of
insurance, each of whom shall be a representative of 1 of the 3 health insurance companies
having the most insured lives in the commonwealth; and 7 persons to be appointed by the
commissioner of public health, 1 of whom shall be a representative of an employer that self-
of 4

insures for health coverage who shall be appointed from lists of nominees submitted by statewide
associations of employers, 1 of whom shall be a member of the Massachusetts Medical Society,
1 of whom shall be a member of the Massachusetts chapter of the American Academy of
Pediatrics, 1 of whom shall be a member of the Massachusetts Academy of Family Physicians,
and 3 of whom shall be physicians licensed to practice in the commonwealth and who shall have
expertise in the area of childhood vaccines. The council shall recommend the amount of funding
needed each fiscal year by calculating the total non-federal program cost.
SECTION 2. Section 24N of Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out paragraph (d) in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the following
paragraph:-
(d) Under regulations adopted by the commissioner of public health, each surcharge
payor in the commonwealth shall pay to the commissioner of public health, for deposit in the
Vaccine Purchase Trust Fund, a routine childhood immunizations surcharge assessed by the
commissioner. By January 1 of each year, the commissioner of public health shall determine the
total amount of the surcharge for the current fiscal year by determining the final amount required
to be included in the Vaccine Purchase Trust Fund for the current fiscal year to cover the
estimated costs to purchase, store and distribute immunizations for routine childhood
immunizations and to administer the fund and the immunization registry, established pursuant to
section 24M. The amount shall take into consideration the limitations on expenditures described
in subsection (b) any anticipated surplus or deficit in the trust fund, and shall exclude any costs
anticipated to be covered by federal contribution. Any increase in the surcharge amount for the
prior fiscal year shall not be more than the percentage set as the health care cost growth
benchmark, established under section 9 of chapter 6D, unless the commissioner of public health
of 4

submits a detailed report to the clerks of the house of representatives and senate who shall
forward the report to the house and senate committees on ways and means, the house and senate
chairs of the joint committee on public health and the house and senate chairs of the joint
committee on health care financing explaining the need for the increase.
SECTION 3. Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 244 the following section:-
Section 245. (1) The department shall implement a provider immunization brand choice
requirement as part of the Commonwealth’s universal immunization program pursuant to
sections 24I and 24N of chapter 111; the vaccines for children program operated by the
department under the authority of 42 U.S.C. §1396s; and in any other existing or future
immunization program for children or adults administered through the state using local, state or
federal funds.
(2) Pursuant to the provider immunization brand choice requirement, for all categories of
immunizations included in the programs described in paragraph (1) of this section, all healthcare
providers participating in these programs must be able to select any brand or type of any
immunization (including any combination immunization and dosage form), as long as the
immunization is licensed or authorized for emergency use by the federal Food and Drug
Administration and recommended by the national Centers for Disease Control and Prevention
Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices. The department may not limit the ability of
such healthcare providers to provide an immunization by limiting the supply of immunizations
purchased by the department This section shall not apply in the event of a shortage or delay in
of 4

vaccine availability, disaster or public health emergency, terrorist attack, hostile military or
paramilitary action, or extraordinary law enforcement emergency.
Use of Vaccine Lists. The department shall use, for the purpose of the purchase, delivery
and administration of vaccines, the CDC vaccine list established (and periodically reviewed and,
as appropriate, revised) by the Advisory Committee of Immunization Practices, an advisory
committee established by the US Secretary of Health and Human services acting through the
Director of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
(3) The department shall implement all or part of the provider immunization brand choice
requirement as soon as it is determined to be feasible, provided, however, that the department
shall complete full implementation of the system not later than July 1, 2025.
of 4